Hawaii, session 2026, SB2894.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 249-31, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§249-31 State and county registration [fee.] fees.  (a)  All vehicles and motor vehicles in the State [as defined in section 249-1], including antique motor vehicles, except as otherwise provided in sections 249-4, 249-6, and 249‑31.5, shall be subject to a $46 annual vehicle registration fee; provided that alternative fuel vehicles shall pay an annual vehicle registration surcharge of $50, which shall be assessed and collected beginning with the first registration renewal for every alternative fuel vehicle and shall be deposited into the state highway fund established under section 248-8.  The surcharge shall be paid each year together with all other taxes and fees levied by this chapter on a staggered basis as established by each county as authorized by section 286-51, and the state registration for that county shall likewise be staggered so that the state registration fee is due and payable at the same time and shall be collected together with the county fee. The state registration fee shall be deemed delinquent if not paid with the county registration fee.  The respective counties shall collect this fee together with the vehicle registration tax collected for the county and shall transfer the moneys collected under this [section] subsection and subsection (b) to the State. For the purposes of this subsection, "alternative fuel vehicle" means a vehicle powered by a non-petroleum-based fuel, but excludes an electric vehicle as defined in section 249-36(g). (b) In addition to the annual vehicle registration surcharge fee, for each annual motor vehicle registration fee, the director shall deposit $40 into the state highway fund, $5 into the emergency medical services special fund, and $1 into the accessible parking special account. (c)  Notwithstanding any county ordinance to the contrary, a county's annual vehicle registration fee shall be equal to the annual vehicle registration fee imposed pursuant to subsection (a)." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________